Maryland, session 2026, HB0504.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Health Occupations
2–201.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0504*

HOUSE BILL 504
There is a State Board of Examiners for Audiologists, Hearing Aid Dispensers,
Speech–Language Pathologists, and Music Therapists in the Department.
2–202.
(a) (1) The Board consists of [15] 13 members.
(2) Of the [15] 13 Board members:
(i) 3 shall be licensed audiologists who have at least 5 years’ paid
work experience in audiology and are currently practicing audiology in the State;
(ii) 3 shall be licensed speech–language pathologists who have at
least 5 years’ paid work experience in speech–language pathology and are currently
practicing speech–language pathology in the State;
(iii) [2 shall be physicians who shall be voting members of the Board,
except on proposals that expand or restrict the practice of audiology as defined in § 2–101(q)
of this title or that expand or restrict the practice of speech–language pathology as defined
in § 2–101(r) of this title, and who:
1. Are licensed to practice medicine in the State;
2. Hold a certificate of qualification from the American Board
of Otolaryngology; and
3. Are currently practicing in the State;
(iv)] 2 shall be consumer members, 1 of whom shall be a consumer of
services provided by an individual licensed by the Board;
[(v)] (IV) 3 shall be licensed hearing aid dispensers who have at
least 5 years’ paid work experience in dispensing hearing aids and are currently practicing
hearing aid dispensing in the State; and
[(vi)] (V) 2 shall be licensed music therapists who have at least 5
years’ paid work experience in music therapy and are currently practicing music therapy
in the State.
(3) [(i) The Governor shall appoint the physician members, with the
advice of the Secretary, from a list submitted to the Secretary and the Governor by the
Maryland Society of Otolaryngology.
(ii) There shall be at least 3 names on the list.

HOUSE BILL 504 3
(4)] (i) The Governor shall appoint the speech–language pathologist
members, with the advice of the Secretary, from a list submitted to the Secretary and the
Governor by the Board.
(ii) The number of names on the list shall be at least 3 times the
number of vacancies.
(iii) For each licensed speech–language pathologist vacancy, the
Board shall notify all licensed speech–language pathologists in the State of the vacancy to
solicit nominations to fill the vacancy.
[(5)] (4) (i) Subject to subparagraph (iii) of this paragraph, the
Governor shall appoint the audiologist members, with the advice of the Secretary, from a
list submitted to the Secretary and the Governor by the Maryland Academy of Audiology.
(ii) The number of names on the list shall be at least 3 times the
number of vacancies.
(iii) For each audiologist vacancy, the Board shall notify all licensed
audiologists in the State of the vacancy to solicit nominations to fill the vacancy.
[(6)] (5) (i) The Governor shall appoint the hearing aid dispenser
members, with the advice of the Secretary, from a list submitted to the Secretary and the
Governor by the Board.
(ii) The number of names on the list shall be at least 3 times the
number of vacancies.
(iii) For each hearing aid dispenser vacancy, the Board shall notify
all licensed hearing aid dispensers in the State of the vacancy to solicit nominations to fill
the vacancy.
[(7)] (6) (i) The Governor shall appoint the consumer members with
the advice of the Secretary and the advice and consent of the Senate.
(ii) The Board and the Secretary may solicit applications for
consumer member vacancies from the general public.
(iii) 1. The Governor shall appoint the consumer member who is
a consumer of services provided by an individual licensed by the Board from a list submitted
by the Secretary.
2. An organization representing patients or family members
of patients served by individuals licensed by the Board may submit recommendations for
the consumer Board member appointed under this subparagraph to the Secretary.

HOUSE BILL 504
3. The Board and the Secretary may notify organizations
representing patients or family members of patients served by individuals licensed by the
Board of a vacancy for the consumer member appointed under this subparagraph.
[(8)] (7) (i) The Governor shall appoint the music therapist members,
with the advice of the Secretary, from a list submitted to the Secretary and the Governor
by the Maryland Association for Music Therapy.
(ii) The number of names on the list shall be at least 3 times the
number of vacancies.
(iii) On or before December 31, 2021, the music therapist members
shall be board certified music therapists, as defined in § 2–4A–01 of this title.
(iv) On or after January 1, 2022, the music therapist members shall
be licensed professional music therapists, as defined in § 2–4A–01 of this title.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the terms of the two physician
members of the State Board of Examiners for Audiologists, Hearing Aid Dispensers,
Speech–Language Pathologists, and Music Therapists in office on the effective date of this
Act shall terminate on June 30, 2026.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect June
1, 2026.